Utah statutes.
39-6-106.   Acts discrediting National Guard.

All acts of disorder and neglect prejudicing the good order and discipline in the National Guard, all conduct bringing discredit upon the National Guard, of which persons subject to this chapter may be guilty, shall be considered in a military court, according to the nature and degree of the offense, and shall be punished at the discretion of that court.

